Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.050

Certain corrupt practices of school officials—Penalty.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 42.23 RCW, it shall be unlawful for any member of the state board of education, the superintendent of public instruction or any employee of the superintendent's office, any educational service district superintendent, any school district superintendent or principal, or any director of any school district, to request or receive, directly or indirectly, anything of value for or on account of his or her influence with respect to any act or proceeding of the state board of education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, any office of educational service district superintendent or any school district, or any of these, when such act or proceeding shall inure to the benefit of those offering or giving the thing of value.

(2) Any willful violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 168; 1990 c 33 s 537; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 143; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 150; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.090. Prior: 1917 c 126 s 1; RRS s 5050. Formerly RCW 28A.87.090, 28.87.090.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.